Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-431
Infraction, defined.

As used in sections 28-416, 29-422, 29-424, 29-425, 29-431 to 29-434, and 53-173, unless the context otherwise requires, infraction means the violation of any law, ordinance, order, rule, or regulation, not including those related to traffic, which is not otherwise declared to be a misdemeanor or a felony. Infraction includes violations of section 60-6,267 and beginning January 1, 2024, section 60-6,279.

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 534, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB884, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 7.
July 18, 2026